Utah statutes.
76-10-1207.   Use of real property by tenant or occupant -- Voiding of lease
-- Allowance of such use by owner or lessor.
(1) If a tenant or occupant of real property uses this property for an
activity for which he or his employee is convicted under any provision of this
part, the conviction makes void the lease or other title under which he holds
at the option of the fee owner or any intermediate lessor; and 10 days after
the fee owner or any intermediate lessor gives notice in writing to the tenant
or occupant that he is exercising the option, the right of possession to the
property reverts in the person exercising the option. This option does not
arise until all avenues of direct appeal from the conviction have been
exhausted or abandoned by the tenant or occupant, or his employee.
(2)  It shall be unlawful for a fee owner or intermediate lessor of real
property to knowingly allow this property to be used for the purpose of
distributing or exhibiting pornographic materials, or for pornographic
performances, by a tenant or occupant if the tenant or occupant, or his
employee, has been convicted under any provision of this part of an offense
occurring on the same property and all avenues of direct appeal from the
conviction have been exhausted or abandoned.
(a)  "Allow" under this subsection (2) means a failure to exercise the option
arising under subsection (1) within 10 days after the fee owner or lessor
receives notice in writing from the county attorney of the county where the
property is situated, or if situated in a city of the first or second class,
from the city attorney of that city, that the property is being used for a
purpose prohibited by this subsection (2).
(b)  A willful violation of this subsection (2) is a class A misdemeanor and
any fine assessed, if not paid within 30 days after judgment, shall become a
lien upon the property.
(3)  Any tenant or occupant who receives a notice in writing that the fee
owner or intermediate lessor is exercising the option provided by subsection
(1) and who does not quit the premises within 10 days after the giving of that
notice is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
